Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-802. Joint Committee on Energy — Membership — Cochairs.

There is created a joint standing committee of the House of Representatives and the Senate to be known as the “Joint Committee on Energy”.

The Joint Committee on Energy shall be a select committee of the House of Representatives and Senate whose members shall be chosen as follows:

Ten (10) members of the Senate to be named pursuant to the Rules of the Senate.

Each Senate member is authorized to appoint a member of the Senate to serve as his or her alternate on the Joint Committee on Energy; and

Fifteen (15) members of the House of Representatives to be selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

One (1) alternate member for each of the fifteen (15) House members shall be selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives.

Senate members and alternate Senate members of the Joint Committee on Energy shall be appointed at each regular biennial session of the General Assembly and shall serve until the convening of the next regular session of the General Assembly.

Members appointed to the Joint Committee on Energy shall serve on the Joint Committee on Energy in addition to their service on the regular standing and select committees of the Senate.

One (1) of the Senate members of the Joint Committee on Energy shall be designated pursuant to the Rules of the Senate to serve as the Senate Cochair of the Joint Committee on Energy.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate two (2) of the House members appointed to the Joint Committee on Energy to serve as the House Cochair of the Joint Committee on Energy and the House Co-vice Chair of the Joint Committee on Energy.

The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Energy shall preside at alternate meetings of the Joint Committee on Energy unless the cochairs shall agree otherwise.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-1201, 4-1202; Acts 1991, No. 15, § 1; 1991, No. 995, § 2; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 32, § 1; 1993, No. 517, § 2; 1995, No. 1330, § 1; 2001, No. 627, § 3; 2003, No. 24, § 2; 2003, No. 380, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 19.

10-3-803. Duties of Joint Committee on Energy.

Bills pertaining to energy sources, supplies, needs, and problems shall be referred to the Joint Committee on Energy. In addition, the Joint Committee on Energy shall make continuing studies and shall cooperate with the appropriate agencies of this state, agencies of the United States Government, and the Congress of the United States in the exchange and dissemination of information and in the development of legislation, designed to promote the conservation and efficient utilization of existing energy sources, and in developing new energy sources to meet the needs of this and future generations.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1202.

10-3-804 — 10-3-819. [Reserved.]

The members of the House of Representatives and the Senate appointed at each regular session of the General Assembly to the Joint Committee on Energy shall constitute a joint interim committee of the General Assembly to function in the interim between the sine die adjournment or extended recess of the regular session or fiscal session of each General Assembly until the convening of the next regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly or reconvening of the current General Assembly during an extended recess. This joint interim committee shall be known as the “Joint Interim Committee on Energy” and shall function in addition to the other interim committees of the General Assembly established by law. In the event a vacancy shall occur on the Joint Interim Committee on Energy, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided for the initial appointment.

The Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall make continuing studies of energy resources and problems, either initiated by the Joint Interim Committee on Energy or referred to it by either house of the General Assembly for study, in the interim between sessions of the General Assembly. Interim study proposals and resolutions filed with the Legislative Council under the provisions of § 10-3-214 for review and referral to the appropriate germane interim committee of the General Assembly, relating to energy, shall be referred to the Joint Interim Committee on Energy. The Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall undertake each study referred to it by members of the General Assembly or by the Legislative Council and shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations in regard to each study request prior to the convening of the next regular session of the General Assembly.

In addition, the Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall exercise leadership in the interim between legislative sessions and shall attempt to coordinate the various energy activities, studies, and planning activities of the General Assembly which relate to the conservation, development, and use of energy resources for the various committees of the General Assembly.

The Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall cooperate with the Governor, the appropriate administrative agencies of this state, legislative and administrative agencies of other states, and with the federal government, including participation in regional and national meetings and seminars of state and federal officials in the exchange of information and data on energy resources, supplies, reserves, and in the conservation, storage, and use of energy, including the disposal of energy waste and by-products.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “regular session or fiscal session” for “regular session” twice in the first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 798, § 3: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the Joint Performance Review Committee should be increased and such new members should assume duties upon adjournment of the General Assembly, and that unless this emergency clause is adopted the effective date of this act will be ninety (90) days subsequent to adjournment. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 517, § 10: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws concerning certain committees of the House of Representatives and the General Assembly are in need of clarification and revision for the efficient operation of the General Assembly and that this act is immediately necessary to assist the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly in carrying out its duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 24, § 4: Jan. 29, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the membership of the interim committees addressed by this act should be modified to reflect a better representation of the House and Senate; that this act accomplishes that purpose; that the committees identified by this act may commence meeting immediately upon adjournment of this session, and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, the modification of the membership will not occur for three months after the date of adjournment resulting in either obsolete membership for the first three months of the interim or a three-month delay in the committees commencing their work. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 380, § 3: Mar. 17, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Senate Rules adopted for the Eighty-fourth General Assembly provide for ten (10) Senate members on the Joint Committee on Energy and ten (10) Senate members on the Joint Performance Review Committee; that the statutes relating to those committees indicate seven (7) Senate members on each committee; that the statutes further provide that the Senate members are selected according to Senate Rules; that until the statutes are amended, there will be a conflict between the Senate Rules and the statutes; and that it is imperative that the Senate Rules and the statutes not be in conflict. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Members of the committee shall be entitled to per diem and mileage at the rate provided by law to be paid from funds appropriated for payment of per diem and mileage for attendance at meetings of interim committees of the House and Senate.

When meeting as a joint committee, the committee may subpoena persons, documents, and records upon approval of a majority of the House membership of the committee and a majority of the Senate membership of the committee.

However, no action of the joint committee regarding the exercise of the subpoena power shall be taken except upon notice of at least one (1) week to all members of the committee or upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the House membership of the committee and a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the Senate membership of the committee.

If the House members meet as a separate committee under subsection (b) of this section, the House committee may subpoena persons, documents, and records upon approval of a majority of the membership of the House committee.

However, no action of the House committee regarding the exercise of the subpoena power shall be taken except upon notice of at least one (1) week to all members of the House committee or upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the membership of the House committee.

If the Senate members meet as a separate committee under subsection (b) of this section, the Senate committee may subpoena persons, documents, and records upon approval of a majority of the membership of the Senate committee.

However, no action of the Senate committee regarding the exercise of the subpoena power shall be taken except upon notice of at least one (1) week to all members of the Senate committee or upon a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the membership of the Senate committee.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1203; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 19; 2009, No. 962, § 21.

10-3-821. Joint Interim Committee on Energy — Meetings — Cooperation with other states.

The Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall meet upon call by either or both of the cochairs of the Joint Interim Committee on Energy, or at such other times as may be provided in the rules of the Joint Interim Committee on Energy, or upon written call by any five (5) of its members.

The Joint Interim Committee on Energy shall cooperate with the Southwest Regional Energy Council, the Council of State Governments, the Southern Legislative Conference, the Southern States Energy Board, the National Conference of State Legislatures and its committees, and other appropriate conferences or associations of public officials concerned with the problems of energy for the purpose of coordinating the combined energy activities and resources of the legislative departments of the respective states in efforts to assist the Congress of the United States and the federal government in coordinating state and national programs for the conservation, preservation, and use of our energy resources.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1205.

10-3-822. Joint Interim Committee on Energy — Expenses — Staff.

The per diem and mileage, including reimbursement for expenses for attending out-of-state meetings as provided by law, shall be paid from funds appropriated for per diem, mileage, and expenses of members of the General Assembly for attending interim committee meetings or from other funds provided by law for that purpose.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall furnish such staff assistance as may be requested by the Joint Interim Committee on Energy. The Arkansas Energy Office and all other appropriate state agencies shall be available to assist and advise the Joint Interim Committee on Energy on energy matters as may be requested by the Joint Interim Committee on Energy.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 8, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1204; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 20.

Subchapter 9

— Joint Performance Review Committee

10-3-901. Creation — Members — Meetings — Expenses.

(1)There is hereby created the “Joint Performance Review Committee”, which shall consist of twenty (20) members of the House of Representatives to be selected as prescribed by the Rules of the House of Representatives and ten (10) members of the Senate to be appointed pursuant to the Rules of the Senate.

(A)There shall be a Senate cochair and a House cochair and a Senate co-vice chair and a House co-vice chair of the committee.

(i)The House cochair and House co-vice chair shall be selected according to the Rules of the House of Representatives.

The Senate cochair and Senate co-vice chair shall be selected according to the Rules of the Senate.

(1)The House members of the committee and the Senate members of the committee may meet separately as separate committees of the House and Senate or may meet jointly as a joint committee at such times as to which the House and Senate membership agree to the holding of joint meetings.

The committee may meet at such places within the state as it deems appropriate.

At all joint meetings of the committee, a quorum shall consist of a majority of the Senate members of the committee and a majority of the House members of the committee.

All votes taken at each joint meeting of the committee shall be by separate Senate vote and separate House vote, and no motion shall pass unless it receives a favorable vote of the majority of the members of the House committee and a favorable vote of the majority of the members of the Senate committee.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 392, §§ 1, 3; 1983, No. 798, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-1013, 4-1015, 4-1017; Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 31, § 1; 1993, No. 517, § 3; 2001, No. 627, § 4; 2003, No. 24, § 3; 2003, No. 380, § 2; 2003, No. 1218, § 1.

10-3-902. Duties.

The Joint Performance Review Committee shall have the authority and responsibility to:

Make random and periodic performance review of specific governmental programs and agencies;

Conduct investigations into such specific problem areas of the administration of state government as may be brought to the attention of the Joint Performance Review Committee;

Refer specific problems regarding the operation of state government to appropriate interim committees of the General Assembly for continuing study;

Conduct hearings on citizen complaints and views regarding the operation of state government and serve as a forum for citizens to air their complaints and suggestions regarding the operation of state government;

Review the expenditures of the various agencies, departments, and programs of state government to assure that they are being administered in accordance with legislative intent and are being administered in such manner as to provide the taxpayers with the greatest service at the lowest reasonable cost; and

Make such reports and recommendations to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Legislative Council as the Joint Performance Review Committee deems necessary or appropriate to promote more effective and efficient operation of state government.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning employment of personnel, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1465, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 392, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1016.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1600, § 1, provided:

“(a)The purpose of this act is to request that the House Interim Committee on Education and the Senate Interim Committee on Education study the requirements for obtaining a four-year degree in education in Arkansas.

“(b)The study shall look at degree programs at institutions of higher education in the state, the courses required for degree completion, the number of hours required for a secondary degree program, and the number of hours that are required to obtain an additional certificate to teach after the person has received his or her original certification.”

Preambles. Acts 1997, No. 748, contained a preamble which read:

“WHEREAS, the imposition of term limits on members of the General Assembly make it imperative that there occur a routine and continual dialogue between the members of the General Assembly and the executive branch bureaucracy; and

“WHEREAS, the funding and management of our public schools is a complicated and highly costly undertaking which necessitates a continual involvement by members of the General Assembly when not in session; and

“WHEREAS, the best method of keeping the membership of the General Assembly informed as to needs and problems of our public schools is for the House and Senate Interim Committees on Education to routinely and continually engage in a dialogue with the General Education Division of the Department of Education, the Vocational and Technical Education Division of the Department of Education, the Department of Higher Education and other state agencies which the committee deems appropriate.

“Now therefore… ”

Acts 2009, No. 964, contained a preamble which read:

“WHEREAS, in recent years, due to the rising costs of higher education, state-supported colleges anniversities in Arkansas have increased undergraduate tuition rates and fees by an average that is greater than the rate of inflation; and

“WHEREAS, higher education's growing reliance on funding budgets from tuition is causing an increasingly disproportionate financial burden on students and their families; and

“WHEREAS, a study is needed to identify the factors influencing the affordability of higher education in this state and to seek ways to address the rising cost of tuition, fees, and other student costs,

“Now therefore… ”

Effective Dates. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1091, § 3: Jan. 30, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a state plan must be submitted to the United States Commissioner of Education not later than July 1, 1977, to be eligible for cost reimbursement under Section 842 of Pub. L. 93-380; and, that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to allow the Joint Interim Committee on Education as much time as possible to develop said plan and to receive reimbursement for the costs incurred in formulating, improving or implementing a state plan for a state program of financial assistance to local school districts which is designed to achieve equalization of educational opportunity for all children in attendance at the schools of the various school districts and such other purposes as the committee deems desirable. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 769, § 21: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1981 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1981 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1987, No. 872, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1091 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 112, § 40: Feb. 7, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Education and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Education; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Education and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on education; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effect on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning federal aid for a state equalization plan, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2121, § 19. The section was derived from Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1091, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1001.1; reen. Acts 1987, No. 872, § 1; Acts 1997, No. 112, § 25.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 337, supersedes the amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 315. Acts 2019, No. 315, amended subsection (c) to read as follows:“(c)The Legislative Council, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on Education are authorized to promulgate standard and uniform forms and rules to be followed by the various area vocational-technical schools in compiling and furnishing information required in this section.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning annual evaluation of vocational-technical courses, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 337, § 1, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 769, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1661; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 747.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 392, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-1014; Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 21.

10-3-903. [Repealed.]

10-3-1001. [Repealed.]

10-3-1003. Routine collaboration with Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, Division of Career and Technical Education, and Division of Higher Education.

The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education between legislative sessions shall continually and routinely:

Assess the needs and problems of:

The public school districts of this state;

Technical institutes and vocational-technical schools; and

Institutions of higher education; and

Engage in a constant dialogue with the:

Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

Division of Career and Technical Education; and

Division of Higher Education.

In order to assist the General Assembly, the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Division of Career and Technical Education, and the Division of Higher Education shall not only respond to the inquiries of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education, but shall of their own motion alert the membership of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education to problems and needs of, and recommendations concerning, all public education endeavors in Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education”, “Division of Career and Technical Education” for “Department of Career Education”, and “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in the section heading and throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 131, § 2: Feb. 23, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that ample and continuously usable quarters are not available to the General Assembly, its members, agencies and committees, especially during that time that the General Assembly is not in session; that such should be available for such work and duties that might be authorized or carried on by its members, agencies or committees either during the official sessions of the General Assembly or ad interim. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 5: Apr. 2, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that additional space for the committees of the General Assembly and legislative staff requirements is needed in the State Capitol Building for the efficient operation of the Senate and the House of Representatives of the General Assembly and the respective standing and joint ad interim committees thereof; that it is imperative that said space be provided for the efficient functioning of the joint interim committees of the General Assembly and that the same be available for the operation of the Senate and the House of Representatives upon convening of the next Regular Session of the General Assembly, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to provide the funds and to establish procedures to make available additional space for the General Assembly in the State Capitol Building, and to provide for the necessary repair, improvement and furnishing thereof. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 273, § 16: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 968, § 4: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities is charged with the responsibility of supervising the construction, improvement, and repair of legislative committee rooms and other legislative facilities in the State Capitol Building during the interim between legislative sessions; that Act 572 of 1973 contained provisions for service on said Committee by members of the General Assembly who no longer serve as members of the House or Senate, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order to revise the membership of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, in order that said members may be appointed and assume their duties immediately upon adjournment of the regular session of the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 969, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assemby for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1240, § 11: Jan. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that recent changes in federal law necessitate an immediate change in the method of reimbursing members of the General Assembly for legislative expenses; this Act grants the authority to the House and Senate to establish expense reimbursement procedures; and this should go into effect immediately in order to allow the House and Senate to comply with federal regulations as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after January 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 517, § 10: Mar. 16, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the laws concerning certain committees of the House of Representatives and the General Assembly are in need of clarification and revision for the efficient operation of the General Assembly and that this act is immediately necessary to assist the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly in carrying out its duties. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 197, § 8: Mar. 27, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that previous General Assemblies have provided appropriations for the projects provided or enumerated in this act; that certain appropriations will expire before the adjournment of the General Assembly; and that if such appropriations expire, the projects and programs authorized herein will cease thereby depriving the citizens of the State of the benefits to be derived from such projects. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 27, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1354, § 51: Apr. 14, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the method of selection of alternate members of the Legislative Council and Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and that this act is immediately necessary for proper continuity and efficiency in State government. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The Chair of the House Joint Budget Committee;

Two (2) members of the House of Representatives selected in accordance with the Rules of the House of Representatives;

The Chair of the House Management Committee and two (2) additional members of the House Management Committee to be designated by its chair;

The Speaker of the House of Representatives or his or her designee;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The Chair of the Senate Joint Budget Committee;

One (1) member of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

Four (4) members of the Senate to be appointed by the Chair of the Senate Efficiency Committee.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “or his or her designee” in (a)(4).

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall serve as secretary to the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities, without a vote.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the subsection designations; and in (a), inserted “sessions, fiscal sessions” following the first occurrence of “regular,” “session, fiscal” following the second occurrence of “regular,” and “fiscal” following the third occurrence of “regular.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1973, No. 572, § 1, referred to in this section was an appropriations provision.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment repealed subsection (c).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 748, § 1; 1999, No. 1323, § 47; 2019, No. 910, § 2210.

Subchapter 11

— Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities

10-3-1101. Creation — Members — Expenses.

There is established a joint interim committee of the Senate and House of Representatives to be known as the “Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities”, to consist of fourteen (14) members of the General Assembly as follows:

(1)The members of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall receive per diem at the rate provided by law for attendance by members of the General Assembly at meetings of interim committees for each day in attending meetings of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities or performing other duties as authorized by the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities.

In addition thereto, the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall receive mileage for travel from their homes to the State Capitol Building.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; 1985, No. 273, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141; Acts 1987, No. 968, § 1; 1991, No. 969, § 6; 1991, No. 1240, § 6; 1993, No. 517, § 4; 1993, No. 1272, § 2; 1997, No. 1354, § 22; 2009, No. 84, § 2.

10-3-1102. Officers — Meetings.

The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall select from its membership two (2) cochairs, one (1) cochair to be a member of the House of Representatives to be elected by the members of the committee who are members of the House and one (1) cochair to be a Senator to be elected by the members of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities who are members of the Senate. The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may elect such other officers as it deems necessary for the performance of its duties.

The two (2) cochairs shall preside at each meeting of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities or may rotate from meeting to meeting as presiding officers, as they determine. A majority vote of the full membership of the Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities shall be necessary to take final action on any matter. The Joint Interim Committee on Legislative Facilities may establish rules for its procedures and shall meet upon call of the cochairs thereof, upon call by a majority of its members, or at other intervals as may be established in its rules.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 572, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-141.